Hawaii statutes.
[§554A-9] Uniformity of interpretation.
This chapter shall be construed to effectuate its general purpose to make
uniform the law of those states which enact it. [L 1985, c 61, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next